Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-4015
Act, how cited.

Sections 19-4015 to 19-4038 shall be known and may be cited as the Business Improvement District Act.

Laws 1979, LB 251, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB168, § 1.